Hawaii, session 2025, HB1286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291C-76, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  [Where sidewalks are not provided any] Any pedestrian walking along and upon a highway where no sidewalks are provided shall, when practicable, walk only on the left side of the roadway or its shoulder facing traffic which may approach from the opposite direction[.]; provided that no pedestrian shall walk along or upon a roadway designated as: (1)  An interstate highway; (2)  Auxiliary interstate highway; or (3)  State highway unless a clearly designated sidewalk is provided on the state highway, except while conducting authorized first responder duties or highway maintenance duties." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________